Illinois, session 104th, HB1572.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 2.01 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/2.01)  (from Ch. 102, par. 42.01)7    Sec. 2.01. All meetings required by this Act to be public 8shall be held at specified times and places which are 9convenient and open to the public. No meeting required by this 10Act to be public shall be held on a legal holiday unless the 11regular meeting day falls on that holiday.12    Except as otherwise provided in this Act or any other 13Illinois statute, a quorum of members of a public body must be 14physically present at the location of an open meeting or 15present by video or audio conference at the open meeting. For 16the purposes of this Section, a member is present by audio or 17video conference at an open meeting if the member can hear and 18be heard by all other members of the body who are participating 19in the meeting. 20    If a member wishes to attend an open meeting by video or 21audio conference, the member must notify the recording 22secretary or clerk of the public body before the meeting, 23unless providing that advance notice is impractical for the   HB1572- 2 -LRB104 06064 BDA 16097 b1member. If, however, an open meeting of a public body (i) with 2statewide jurisdiction, (ii) that is an Illinois library 3system with jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of 4more than 4,500 square miles, (iii) that is a municipal 5transit district with jurisdiction over a specific geographic 6area of more than 4,500 square miles, or (iv) that is a local 7workforce investment area with jurisdiction over a specific 8geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles is held 9simultaneously at one of its offices and one or more other 10locations in a public building, which may include other of its 11offices, through an interactive video conference and the 12public body provides public notice and public access as 13required under this Act for all locations, then members 14physically present in those locations all count towards 15determining a quorum. "Public building", as used in this 16Section, means any building or portion thereof owned or leased 17by any public body. The requirement that a quorum be 18physically present at the location of an open meeting shall 19not apply, however, to State advisory boards or bodies that do 20not have authority to make binding recommendations or 21determinations or to take any other substantive action. 22    Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a quorum of 23members of a public body that is not (i) a public body with 24statewide jurisdiction, (ii) an Illinois library system with 25jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 264,500 square miles, (iii) a municipal transit district with   HB1572- 3 -LRB104 06064 BDA 16097 b1jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 24,500 square miles, or (iv) a local workforce innovation area 3with jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 44,500 square miles must be physically present at the location 5of a closed meeting. Other members who are not physically 6present at a closed meeting of such a public body may 7participate in the meeting by means of a video or audio 8conference. For the purposes of this Section, "local workforce 9innovation area" means any local workforce innovation area or 10areas designated by the Governor pursuant to the federal 11Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or its reauthorizing 12legislation. 13(Source: P.A. 100-477, eff. 9-8-17; 101-640, eff. 6-12-20.) 14    (5 ILCS 120/7 rep.)15    Section 10. The Open Meetings Act is amended by repealing 16Section 7.